Hawaii statutes.
§346-227 Investigation. Upon receiving
a report that abuse of a vulnerable adult has occurred or is in danger of
occurring if immediate action is not taken, the department shall cause an
investigation to be commenced in accordance with this part as the department
deems appropriate. [L 1989, c 381, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 144, §1 and c 234,
§9; am L 2008, c 154, §9]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next